pt-BR: Material de enchimento do pau de chuva: Contas de vidro; Contas de metal/chumbo; Preenchimento misto; Cascalho/pedra; Contas de plástico; Arroz/grão; Areia; Sementes; Pedaços de concha; Outros
bg-BG: Материал на пълнежа на дъждовната пръчка: Стъклени мъниста; Метални мъниста/сачми; Смесен пълнеж; Камъчета/камъни; Пластмасови мъниста; Ориз/зърно; Пясък; Семена; Парченца от миди; Други
th: วัสดุสำหรับบรรจุแท่งฝน: ลูกปัดแก้ว; ลูกปัดโลหะ/เม็ดโลหะ; วัสดุอุดผสม; กรวด/หิน; ลูกปัดพลาสติก; ข้าว/ธัญพืช; ทราย; เมล็ดพืช; ชิ้นส่วนเปลือกหอย; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Polnilni material za dežne palice: Steklene kroglice; Kovinske kroglice/šibre; Mešano polnilo; Prodni kamenčki/kamni; Plastične kroglice; Riž/žito; Pesek; Semena; Kosi školjk; Drugo
nb: Fyllmateriale for regnstav: Glassperler; Metallperler/hagl; Blandet fyll; Småstein/stein; Plastperler; Ris/korn; Sand; Frø; Skjellbiter; Annet
fi: Sadeputken täytemateriaali: Lasihelmet; Metallihelmet/haulit; Sekatäyte; Pikkukivet/kivet; Muovihelmet; Riisi/vilja; Hiekka; Siemenet; Simpukankuoren palat; Muu
da: Fyldmateriale i regnmager: Glasperler; Metalperler/-hagl; Blandet fyld; Småsten/sten; Plastperler; Ris/korn; Sand; Frø; Skaldele; Andet
cs: Výplňový materiál Rainstick: Skleněné korálky; Kovové korálky/broky; Smíšená náplň; Oblázky/kameny; Plastové korálky; Rýže/obilí; Písek; Semínka; Kousky mušlí; Ostatní
fr: Matériau de remplissage du bâton de pluie: Perles de verre; Perles/billes de métal; Remplissage mixte; Cailloux/pierres; Perles en plastique; Riz/céréales; Sable; Graines; Morceaux de coquillages; Autre
en: Rainstick fill material: Glass beads; Metal beads/shot; Mixed fill; Pebbles/stone; Plastic beads; Rice/grain; Sand; Seeds; Shell pieces; Other
zh-CN: 雨声器填充物材质: 玻璃珠; 金属珠/小铅弹; 混合填充物; 卵石/石头; 塑料珠; 大米/谷物; 沙子; 种子; 贝壳碎片; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal za punjenje kišnih štapića: Staklene perle; Metalne kuglice / sačma; Miješano punjenje; Šljunak/kamenje; Plastične perle; Riža/žito; Pijesak; Sjemenke; Komadići školjke; Ostalo
lt-LT: Lietaus lazdelės užpildo medžiaga: Stikliniai karoliukai; Metaliniai karoliukai / šratai; Mišrus užpildas; Akmenukai / akmuo; Plastikiniai karoliukai; Ryžiai / grūdai; Smėlis; Sėklos; Kriauklių gabalėliai; Kita
it: Materiale di riempimento per bastoni della pioggia: Perline di vetro; Perline/pallini di metallo; Riempimento misto; Ciottoli/Pietra; Perline di plastica; Riso/Grano; Sabbia; Semi; Pezzi di conchiglia; Altro
de: Füllmaterial des Regenstabs: Glasperlen; Metallperlen/-schrot; Gemischte Füllung; Kiesel/Steine; Kunststoffperlen; Reis/Getreide; Sand; Samen; Muschelstücke; Sonstige
vi: Vật liệu nhồi cho ống tạo tiếng mưa (rainstick): Hạt thủy tinh; Hạt/viên kim loại; Vật liệu nhồi hỗn hợp; Sỏi/đá; Hạt nhựa; Gạo/ngũ cốc; Cát; Hạt giống; Mảnh vỏ sò; Khác
es: Material de relleno para palos de lluvia: Cuentas de vidrio; Cuentas/perdigones de metal; Relleno mixto; Guijarros/piedras; Cuentas de plástico; Arroz/granos; Arena; Semillas; Trozos de concha; Otro
sk-SK: Výplňový materiál dažďovej palice: Sklenené guľôčky; Kovové guľôčky/broky; Zmiešaná výplň; Kamienky/kameň; Plastové guľôčky; Ryža/obilie; Piesok; Semená; Kúsky mušlí; Iné
pt-PT: Material de enchimento do bastão de chuva: Contas de vidro; Contas/chumbos de metal; Enchimento misto; Seixos/pedras; Contas de plástico; Arroz/grão; Areia; Sementes; Pedaços de concha; Outro
sv: Rainstick-fyllningsmaterial: Glaspärlor; Metallpärlor/hagel; Blandad fyllning; Småsten/sten; Plastpärlor; Ris/spannmål; Sand; Frön; Snäckskalsbitar; Övrigt
hu: Esőbot töltőanyag: Üveggyöngyök; Fémgyöngyök/sörét; Vegyes töltet; Kavicsok/kövek; Műanyag gyöngyök; Rizs/gabonamagvak; Homok; Magvak; Kagylódarabok; Egyéb
ko: 레인스틱 충전재: 유리 구슬; 금속 구슬/산탄; 혼합 충전재; 자갈/돌; 플라스틱 구슬; 쌀/곡물; 모래; 씨앗; 조개 껍데기 조각; 기타
el: Υλικό πλήρωσης για rainstick: Γυάλινες χάντρες; Μεταλλικές χάντρες/σφαιρίδια; Ανάμεικτο υλικό γέμισης; Βότσαλα/πέτρες; Πλαστικές χάντρες; Ρύζι/σπόροι; Άμμος; Σπόροι; Κομμάτια από κοχύλια; Άλλο
ru: Материал наполнения рейнстика: Стеклянные бусины; Металлические бусины/дробь; Смешанный наполнитель; Галька/камень; Пластиковые бусины; Рис/зерно; Песок; Семена; Кусочки ракушек; Другое
ja: レインスティック充填材: ガラスビーズ; 金属ビーズ/ショット; 混合フィラー; 小石/石; プラスチックビーズ; 米/穀物; 砂; 種子; 貝殻の欠片; その他
zh-TW: 雨聲器填充材質: 玻璃珠; 金屬珠/霰彈; 混合填充物; 鵝卵石/石頭; 塑膠珠; 稻米/穀物; 沙子; 種子; 貝殼碎片; 其他
tr: Rainstick dolgu malzemesi: Cam boncuklar; Metal boncuklar/saçma; Karışık dolgu; Çakıl/taş; Plastik boncuklar; Pirinç/tahıl; Kum; Tohumlar; Deniz kabuğu parçaları; Diğer
pl: Materiał wypełniający Rainstick: Szklane koraliki; Metalowe koraliki/śrut; Wypełnienie mieszane; Kamyki/kamienie; Plastikowe koraliki; Ryż/ziarno; Piasek; Nasiona; Kawałki muszli; Inne
ro-RO: Material de umplutură pentru baston de ploaie: Mărgele de sticlă; Mărgele/bile de metal; Umplutură mixtă; Pietricele/piatră; Mărgele de plastic; Orez/cereale; Nisip; Semințe; Bucăți de scoică; Altele
nl: Rainstick vulmateriaal: Glazen kralen; Metalen kralen/hagel; Gemengde vulling; Kiezelstenen/steen; Plastic kralen; Rijst/graan; Zand; Zaden; Stukjes schelp; Overig